Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Merger

48-244-101. Merger.

Merger. With or without a business purpose and pursuant to a plan of merger, a domestic LLC may merge with or into one (1) or more entities formed or organized under the laws of this state or foreign jurisdiction, with the domestic LLC or such other entity, as the plan of merger shall provide, being the surviving or resulting domestic LLC or other entity.

After a plan of merger is approved and before the merger takes effect, the plan may be amended or abandoned as provided in the plan.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-244-102. Approval of merger.

LLC Organized Under the Law of the State of Tennessee. In the case of an LLC organized under the law of this state, unless the articles or operating agreement provide otherwise, the plan must be approved by:

A majority of the board of governors, if the LLC is board-managed; and

Whether or not the LLC is member-managed or board-managed, by the members holding a greater than sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66 2/3%) voting interest of all members entitled to vote and of each class or group entitled to vote. In no event may the articles or operating agreement provide for approval by less than fifty percent (50%) in voting interest in the aggregate.

Other Entities in General. As to entities other than domestic LLCs which are parties to the merger, the plan of merger must be approved by a vote of a majority in voting interest of all owners entitled to vote, except as otherwise specifically provided by the law of this state or of the foreign jurisdiction in which the entity is organized or by the articles, bylaws, partnership agreement or similar equivalent of such entity. In no case may the articles, bylaws, partnership agreement or similar equivalent require less than a fifty percent (50%) in voting interest vote unless the applicable law of the state or foreign jurisdiction specifically provides otherwise.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 68.

Law Reviews.

Delaware LLCs for Tennessee Lawyers? (Richard Spore), 35 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1999).

48-244-103. Certificate of merger.

If a domestic LLC is merging under this section, the domestic LLC or business entity surviving or resulting in or from the merger shall file a certificate of merger in the office of the secretary of state. The certificate of merger must be executed by a duly authorized person and set forth:

The name, jurisdiction and date of formation or organization of each of the LLCs or other entities which is a party to the merger;

That a plan of merger has been approved and executed by each of the LLCs and other business entities which are a party to the merger;

The name and address of the principal executive office or equivalent thereof, of the surviving or resulting entity into which the other entities will merge;

Whether the surviving entity is an LLC, general partnership, limited partnership, corporation or form of other entity;

The future effective date or time, which shall be a date or time certain and which shall comply with § 48-247-109(b) of the merger if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the plan of merger;

That the plan of merger is on file at a place of business of the surviving or resulting entity, and shall state the address thereof;

That a copy of the plan of merger will be furnished by the surviving or resulting entity, on request and without cost, to any member of any domestic LLC or any persons holding an interest in any other entity which is or was a party to the merger; and

If the surviving or resulting entity is not a domestic LLC, or an entity other than a general partnership organized under the laws of this state, a statement that such surviving or resulting entity agrees that it may be served with process in this state in any action, suit or proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation of any entity which is a party to the merger, irrevocably appointing the secretary of state as its agent to accept service of process in any such action, suit or proceeding and specifying the address to which a copy of such process shall be mailed to it by the secretary of state. In the event of service hereunder upon the secretary of state, the procedures set forth in § 48-208-105 shall be applicable, except that the plaintiff in any such action, suit or proceeding shall furnish the secretary of state with the address specified in the certificate of merger provided for in this section and any other address which the plaintiff may elect to furnish, together with copies of such process as required by the secretary of state, and the secretary of state shall notify such surviving or resulting other business entity at all such addresses furnished by the plaintiff in accordance with the procedures set forth in § 48-208-105.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-244-104. Filing and effect of certificate of merger.

Effective Date of Merger. Unless a future effective date or time complying with § 48-247-109(b) is provided in the certificate of merger, in which event the merger shall be effective at any such future effective date or time, a merger shall be effective upon the filing in the office of the secretary of state of the plan of merger.

LLC Effect. The articles of merger as filed with the office of the secretary of state shall act as notice of dissolution and articles of termination for a domestic LLC which is not the surviving or resulting entity in the merger.

General Effect of Merger. When any merger shall have become effective under this part:

Every entity which is a party to the merger other than the surviving entity ceases to exist;

All property, real, personal, tangible and intangible, owned by each of the merged entities vests in the surviving or resulting entity;

All obligations and duties of every entity that is a party to the merger become the obligations and duties of the surviving or resulting entity and all liens upon any property of any of the merged business entities shall be preserved unimpaired and may be enforced against the surviving or resulting entity to the same extent as if the debts, liabilities and duties had been incurred or contracted by the surviving or resulting entity;

An action or proceeding pending against an entity which is a party to the merger may be continued as if the merger had not occurred or the surviving entity may be substituted as a party to the action or proceeding;

Unless otherwise provided in the certificate of merger or as may be required by applicable law, a domestic entity which is not the surviving or resulting entity in the merger shall not be required to wind up its affairs or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets; and

If obligations incurred before the merger by a party to the merger are not able to be satisfied out of the property of the surviving entity, all partners, members or shareholders of such party immediately before the effective date of the merger shall be obligated to contribute to the surviving entity to the extent and in the manner such persons would have been obligated to contribute to such party in the event such obligations of such party could not have been satisfied out of the property of such party.

Personal Liabilities of a Member. A member of the surviving LLC is liable for:

All obligations of a party to the merger for which the member was personally liable before the merger; and

All obligations of the surviving entity incurred after the merger takes effect, to the extent imposed under applicable law or by contract executed by such member.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, §§ 69-73.